Hawaii, session 2026, SB639.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that Hawaii has been blessed with some of the purest water (wai) on Earth.  The islands' age, location in the Pacific, geography, geology, and native ecosystems provide groundwater that has been given purity index scores of over nine hundred. The legislature further finds that the State's freshwater resources have also been appropriately recognized as sacred and essential to all life, and the protection and careful stewardship of Hawaii's wai has been a priority of kanaka oiwi culture and governance since time immemorial. The legislature also finds that the contamination of local groundwater and drinking water sources with jet fuel from underground storage tanks must not be tolerated.  As emphasized by state and county agency officials and elected leaders who participated in the Red Hill Water Alliance Initiative, any contamination must be fully remediated; there should be no acceptable level of jet fuel in the State's precious and otherwise pure wai. The purpose of this Act is to: (1)  Require an owner or operator of an underground storage tank or tank system with a confirmed release to meet certain standards for the restoration of the environment; and (2)  Establish a rebuttable presumption that the detection of any amount of jet fuel, jet fuel additives, or compounds in the vicinity of an underground storage tank or tank system after a confirmed release is the result of the confirmed release. SECTION 2.  Section 342L-35, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "§342L-35  Response to suspected or confirmed releases.  (a)  The department, pursuant to chapter 91, shall adopt requirements for investigating a suspected release and taking action in response to a confirmed release from an underground storage tank or tank system, which shall include at least the following: (1)  Requirement that when a release is found, the substances in the tank or tank system be emptied if emptying the substances does not present a greater danger to human health or the environment; (2)  Requirement for proper closure of the tank or tank system, following the requirements established under section 342L-37, or repair and testing of the tank or tank system before placing it back into operation; (3)  Requirement that the owner and operator of the underground storage tank or tank system that had a release restore the environment to a condition and quality acceptable to the department[;], subject to subsection (b); and (4)  Requirement to notify those members of the public directly affected by the release and the proposed response to the release. (b)  Restoration of the environment, as described in subsection (a)(3), shall require the cleanup and removal of jet fuel, including jet fuel additives and compounds resulting from the degradation of jet fuel or jet fuel additives, or the reaction of jet fuel or jet fuel additives with water or other chemicals, as soon as practicable, to levels below the detection limits of the best and most sensitive technology and methods available, with the goal of complete remediation. (c)  It shall be a rebuttable presumption that the detection of any amount of jet fuel, jet fuel additives, or compounds derived from jet fuel or jet fuel additives in the environment or groundwater in the vicinity of an underground storage tank or tank system, after a confirmed release from an underground storage tank or tank system, is the result of the confirmed release." SECTION 3. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 3000.